Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1055.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2706.1. Intimidation of health care workers.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of intimidation of a health care worker if the person:(1) knowingly and willfully makes a threat orally or in writing against any health care practitioner, technician or hospital security officer with the intent to intimidate, interfere with or impede the performance of official duties; or(2) knowingly or willfully sends or delivers a threat prohibited under paragraph (1).1234567891011121314151617 (b) Grading.--(1) A first offense under subsection (a) shall constitute a summary offense.(2) A second or subsequent offense under subsection (a) shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree.(c) Posting of notice.--Notice of the offense under this section shall be posted conspicuously at each public entrance to each health care facility. No person shall be convicted of an offense under this section if the notice was not posted at each public entrance of the health care facility unless the person had actual notice of the offense.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Health care facility." The term shall have the meaning given to it in section 103 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Health care practitioner." The term shall have the meaning given to it in section 103 of the Health Care Facilities Act."Hospital security officer." An employee of a hospital charged with maintaining the safety and security of the property of the hospital and the individuals on the property."Technician." The term shall have the meaning given to it in the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1055PN1146 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526